
FI7052

DI−34
−DIAGNOSTICS ENGINE

1HZ, 1HD−T, 1HD−FTE ENGINE (RM617E)

DTC 19 (2) Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit
Malfunction (IDL Switch/Range Malfunction)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 19 (1) (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Open/Short)) on page DI−27.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Condition (a) or (b) continue 0.5 sec. or more:
(a) IDLONandVA> 1.4V
(b) IDLONandVAS> 1.4V

19(2)

Condition (a) or (b) continue 0.5 sec. or more:
(a) IDLOFFandVA<0.6V
(b) IDL OFF and VAS < 0.6 V

SOpenorshort inacceleratorpedalpositionsensorcircuit
SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEngineECU

Conditions (a) and (b) continue 0.05 sec. or more:
(a) 0.6 V < VA < 4.4 V and 0.6 V < VAS < 4.4 V
(b)VA − VAS>0.5V

Engine ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

Refer to DTC 19 (1) (Accelerator Pedal Position Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Open/Short)) on page DI−27.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
Whenusinghand −held tester

1 Connect thehand −held tester, readthe IDLsignal.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
CHECK:
Read the IDL signal.

OK:

Accelerator pedal IDL signal

Fully open OFF

Fully closed ON

OK Go to step 4.

NG
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2 Check voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine
ECU.
OK:

Accelerator pedal Voltage

Fully closed 9 − 14 V

Fully open 0 − 3 V

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair harness or connector.

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

4 Connect the hand−held tester, read the accelerator pedal operating percentage
(See page DI−27 , Step 1).

OK Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI−4) .

OK
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5 Check voltage between terminal VCC of wire harness side connector and body
ground (See page DI−27, Step 2).

NG Go to step 8.

OK

6 Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−27, Step 3).

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

7 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair harness or connector.

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

8 Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−27, Step 5).

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK

Check for open in harness and connecter between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN−1 9) .
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When not using hand−held tester

1 Check voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals IDL and E2C of engine
ECU.
OK:

Accelerator pedal Voltage

Fully closed 9 − 14 V

Fully open 0 − 3 V

OK Go to step 3.

NG

2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (IDL line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair harness or connector.

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

3 Check voltage between terminal 4 of wire harness side connector and body-
ground (See page DI−27, Step 2).

NG Go to step 6.

OK
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4 Check voltage between terminals VA, VAS and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−27, Step 3).

OK Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

NG

5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
accelerator pedal position sensor (VA, VAS line) (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair harness or connector.

OK

Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

6 Check voltage between terminals VCC and E2C of engine ECU
(See page DI−27, Step 5).

NG Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .

OK

Check for open in harness and connector between engine ECU and accelerator pedal position
sensor (VCC line) (See page IN−1 9) .


